src/fst/morphology/stems/tobar.lexc
!****************************************************************************
!! Tobar - ac Grianna
!
!! E. Uí Dhonnchadha
!! Jan 2009
!****************************************************************************


LEXICON Tobar  !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 

abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp:adeireadh		#; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 

! IS (Copula)
is_ea+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg:is_ea	#;	 !!≈ -  **@CODE@**  is ea
is_éard+Cop+Pres+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:is_éard	 #;	 !!≈ -  **@CODE@** is éard
is_é+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:is_é	#;	! is é
is_é+Cop+Pres+Dep+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:gurb_é	#;	! gurb é
is_í+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Fem:is_í	#;	! is í
is_iad+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Pl:is_iad	#;	! is iad
is_é+Cop+Past+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:ba_é	#;	! ba é
is_í+Cop+Past+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Fem:ba_í	#;	! ba í
is_iomaí+Cop+Pres+Adj+Base:is_iomaí	#;	! is iomaí
is_ionann+Cop+Pres+Adj+Base:is_ionann	#;	! is ionann
is_maith+Cop+Pres+Adj+Comp:gurbh_fhearr	#;	! gurbh fhearr
is_maith+Cop+Past+Rel+Adj+Comp:ab_fhearr	#;	! ab fhearr
is_fiú+Cop+Pres+Noun+Com+Masc+Sg:gurbh_fhiú	#;
is_féidir+Cop+Past+Rel+Subst+Noun+Sg+Len:ab_fhéidir	#;
is_éigean+Cop+Pres+RelInd+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:arbh_éigean	#;
cén_t-ainm+Cop+Q+Art+Noun+Com+Masc+Sg:Cén_t-ainm	#;
is_as+Cop+Past+Prep+Simp:ba_as	#;	! 

cad_é+Cop+Pro+Q:cad_é		#;	! caidé, goidé
cá_as+Adv+Q+Prep+Simp:cá_as	#;	! 
cá_ar+Adv+Q+Prep+Simp:cá_ar	#;	! 

arna_mhárach+Prep+Cmpd+Subst+Noun+Sg:arna_mhárach	#;
chun_an+Prep+Simp+Art+Sg+Def:chun_an	#;
chun_na+Prep+Simp+Art+Pl+Def:chun_na	#;
i_measc+Prep+Simp+Noun+Com+Masc+Sg:i_measc	#;

cé_gur+Conj+Subord+Cop+Pres+Dep:cé_gur	#;
cé_is+Conj+Subord+Cop+Pres+Dep:cé_is	#;
        

! PHRASAL COMPOUNDS
! First word is head of phrase 

bord_cinn+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg_Len:bhord_cinn	#;
bád_abhann+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bád_abhann	#;
beacán_bearaigh+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:beacán_bearaigh	#;
bó_bainne+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bó_bainne	#;
bean_tí+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bean_tí	#;
bolg_le_gréin+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bolg_le_gréin	#;
caitheamh_aimsire+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:caitheamh_aimsire	#;
ceann_feadhna+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ceann_feadhna	#;
ceann_feadhna+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:gceann_feadhna	#;
ceann_tuí+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ceann_tuí	#;
cathaoir_láimhe+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+Len:chathaoir_láimhe	#;
cheirt_seo+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+Det+Dem+Len:cheirt_seo	#;
cois_sin+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+Det+Dem+Len:chois_sin	#;
corda_glas+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:chorda_glas	#;
Cú_Chulainn+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:Chú_Chulainn	#;
Cú_Chulainn+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:gCú_Chulainn	#;

ciolar_chiot+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ciolar_chiot	#;
cionn_is+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Conj+Coord:cionn_is	#;
cloch_sneachta+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:cloch_sneachta	#;
cosa_in_airde+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:cosa_in_airde	#;

croitheadh_inchinne+Verbal+Noun+VTI:croitheadh_inchinne	#;
culaith_uisce+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:culaith_uisce	#;
cuma_liom+Adj+Base:cuma_liom	#;
lán_mara+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lán_mara	#;
leabhar_an_tsiúil+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:leabhar_an_tsiúil	#;
leath_bealaigh+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:leath_bealaigh	#;
lionn_dubh+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lionn_dubh	#;
mac_tíre+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:mac_tíre	#;
cac_bó+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:cac_bó	#;
meán_lae+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:meán_lae	#;
meán_lae+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:mheán_lae	#;
meán_oíche+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:meán_oíche	#;
meán_oíche+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:mheán_oíche	#;
láimhe_láidre+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:láimhe_láidre	#;
aon_mheall+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:n-aon_mheall	#;
gach_aon+Det+Qty+Def+Ecl:ngach_aon	#;
gach_aon+Det+Qty+Def:gach_aon	#;
gan_fhios+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:gan_fhios	#;
gan_fhios+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:ngan_fhios	#;
gúngaí_beaga+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl+Ecl:ngúngaí_beaga	#;
nós_chuma_liom+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:nós_chuma_liom	#;
peann_luaidhe+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:peann_luaidhe	#;
ré_dhorcha+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:ré_dhorcha	#;
rosc_catha+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:rosc_catha	#;
saor_adhmaid+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:saor_adhmaid	#;
scáthanna_solais+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:scáthanna_solais	#;
scáth_fearthainne+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scáth_fearthainne	#;
scáth_gréine+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scáth_gréine	#;
séideáin_sealáin+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:séideáin_sealáin	#;
sliogán_tine+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:sliogán_tine	#;
stól_campa+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:stól_campa	#;
stól_lúbtha+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:stól_lúbtha	#;
támhach_táisc+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:támhach_táisc	#;
támhach_táisc+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:thámhach_táisc	#;
taobh_istigh+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:taobh_istigh	#;
aon_fhear+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_fhear	#;
aon_fhear+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:t-aon_fhear	#;
aon_ghnó+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_ghnó	#;
aon_guth+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_ghuth	#;
aon_rud+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_rud	#;
aon_scraith+Num+Card+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:aon_scraith	#;
aon_smaoineamh+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_smaoineamh	#;
aon_turas+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_turas	#;
tír_mór+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:tír_mór	#;
thamhach_táisc+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:thamhach_táisc	#;
trioc_tosaithe+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:trioc_tosaithe	#;
seomra_stáit+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:tseomra_stáit	#;
uisce_beatha+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:uisce_beatha	#;
buíon_cheoil+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:bhuíon_cheoil	#;

seo_againne+Det+Dem+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl+Emph:seo_againne	#;
seo_agamsa+Det+Dem+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg+Emph:seo_agamsa	#;
seo_aicise+Det+Dem+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem+Emph:seo_aicise	#;

anoir_aduaidh+Adv+Dir:anoir_aduaidh	#;
soir_ó_thuaidh+Adv+Dir:soir_ó_thuaidh	#;
thiar_thuaidh+Adv+Dir:Thiar_Thuaidh	#;

gabh_anseo+Verb+VTI+Imper+2P+Sg+Adv+Loc:gabh_anseo	#;
ga_seá+Subst+Noun+Sg:ga_seá	#;
do_do+Prep+Simp+Det+Poss+2P+Sg:do_do	#;
éadach_ola+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:éadach_ola	#;
faoi_mo+Prep+Simp+Det+Poss+1P+Sg:faoi_mo	#;
cliabhán_rothaí+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:gcliabhán_rothaí	#;
gléas_imirce+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:Ghléas_Imirce	#;
innill_tógála+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:innill_tógála	#;


a_déarfadh+Verb+VTI+Vow+Cond:a_déarfadh	#;
a_deir+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresInd:a_deir	#;
a_deirim+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresInd+1P+Sg:a_deirim	#;
a_deireadh+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp:a_deireadh	#;
a_deirtí+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp+Auto:a_deirtí	#;
a_dúirt+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastInd:a_dúirt	#;
a_fheictear+Verb+VTI+PresInd+Auto+Len:a_fheictear	#;
a_fheiceann+Verb+VTI+PresInd+Len:a_fheiceann	#;

arsa_an+Verb+PastInd+Art+Sg+Def:arsa_an	#;
!! PLACENAMES
!        "Abhainn_Dhearg" Guess Unknown Noun ^Abhainn-Dhearg^
!        "An_Astráil" Guess Unknown Noun ^Australia^
!        "Ard_Mhacha" Guess Unknown Noun ^Árdmhacha^
!        "Dhún_na_nGall" Guess Unknown Noun ^Dhúnna-nGall^
!        "Dún_Dá_Leath_Ghlas" Guess Unknown Noun ^Dún-Dá-Leath-Ghlas^
!        "Eas_Aodha_Rua" Guess Unknown Noun ^Eas-Aodh-Ruaidh^
!        "Gleann_Dá_Loch" Guess Unknown Noun ^Gleann-DáLoch^
!        "Hong_Cong" Guess Unknown Noun ^Hong-Kong^

!        "mBaile_an_Easa" Guess Unknown Noun ^mBaile-an-Easa^
!        "mBaile_Átha_Cliath" Guess Unknown Noun ^mBaile-Átha-Cliath^
!     	"Mhaigh_Eo" Guess Unknown Noun ^Mhuigheo^
!	Mhín_an_Chorraigh" Guess Unknown Noun ^Mhín-an-Churraigh^
!        "Mhín_an_Úcaire" Guess Unknown Noun ^Mhín-an-Úcaire^
!        "Thír_Chonaill" Guess Unknown Noun ^Thírchonaill^
!        "Uíbh_Fhailí" Guess Unknown Noun ^Ua bhFáilghe^
!************************************************************************************
